DI-459

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM
CIRCUIT INSPECTION
DTC B0100/13 Short in D Squib Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The D squib circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly, spiral cable and steering wheel pad.
It causes the airbag to deploy when the airbag deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-2.

DTC B0100/13 is recorded when a short is detected in the D squib circuit.

 Spiral cable malfunction
« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
« Shortcircuit between D+ wire harness and D - wire har-
) « Steering wheel pad (D squib)
ness of squib .
. ) * Spiralcable
B0100/13 * D squib malfunction .
* Airbag sensorassembly

*Wire harness
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DI-460
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection. (See step 1 on page DI-549)

A

2 [ Check D squib circuit.

PREPARATION:
Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the con-
. Airbag nector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) between the airbag
=)= 22'[,?; LTI [ sensor sensor assembly and the spiral cable.

D Squib Assembly (See page DI-447)
CHECK:
&> For the connector (on the spiral cable side) between the spiral

cable and the steering wheel pad, measure the resistance be-
D= | 0 D+ tweenD+andD -.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 orHigher

NG> Go to step 5.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©

Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.
Using a service wire, connect D+ and D- of the connector
(on the spiral cable side) between the spiral cable and the
steering wheel pad.

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

OK:

HINT:

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Check DTC.

(See page DI-447)

DTCBO0 100/13is notoutput.

CodesotherthancodeBO 100/13 may be output atthistime, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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DIAGNOSTICS -

SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

4 [ Check D squib.
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PREPARATION:

(@)
(b)

(©
(d)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK.

Disconnect negative (-) terminal cable from the battery,
and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Connect the steering wheel pad connector.

Connect negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

Clear DTC stored in memory.

(See page DI-447)

Turn ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

Turn ignition switch to ACC or ON, and wait at least for 20
seconds.

(f) Check DTC.
(See page DI-447)
OK:
DTCBO 100/13is notoutput.
HINT:
Codesotherthancode B0 100/13 may be outputatthistime, but

they are not relevant to this check.

e )

Replace steering wheel pad.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

5 [Check spiral cable.
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PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnect the connector between the airbag sensor as-
sembly and the spiral cable.

(b) Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the
spiral cable connector on the airbag sensor assembly
side. (See page DI-447)

CHECK:

For the connector (on the spiral cable side) between the spiral

cable and the steering wheel pad, measure the resistance be-

tween D+ and D-.

OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

OK

NG> Repair or replace spiral cable.

6 Check column wire harness.

Column Wire Harness
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PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnect the connector between the column wire har-
ness and airbag sensor assembly.

(b) Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the
column wire harness connector on the airbag sensor as-
sembly side. (See page DI-447)

CHECK:

For the connector (on the column wire harness) between the

column wire harness and spiral cable, measure the resistance

between D+ and D-.

OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

NG> Repair or replace column wire harness.
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7 | Check harness between airbag sensor assembly and column wire harness.

PREPARATION:
Release airbag activation prevention mechanism of the con-
Airbag nector (on the airbag sensor assembly side) between the airbag
Sensor .
Assembh| | S€Nsor assembly and the column wire harness. (See page

DI-447)
CHECK:
For the connector (on the column wire harness side) between
the airbag sensor assembly and the column wire harness, mea-
sure the resistance between D+ and D-.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

Column Wire Harness

il

Hosies HO6804 NG Repair or replace harness or connector be-

tween airbag sensor assembly and column wire
harness.

OK

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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